Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 5 Irrigation Generally

Cross references. —

As to taxation of property of irrigation districts, see §

41-3-773

.

As to procedure upon application for permit for appropriation of water, see §§

41-4-501

through

41-4-512

and

41-4-514

through

41-4-517

.

As to irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-507

.

As to irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-101

through

41-7-1006

.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 to 5.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

For duty of stock drover to prevent his livestock from trespassing upon property of another or from injuring any irrigation ditch or public works, see §

11-20-119

.

As to creation of livestock districts within irrigation district, see §§

11-33-101

through

11-33-109

.

For duty of companies, corporations, etc., operating or maintaining ditches, canals or watercourses, not being a natural stream, for irrigation and other purposes, to construct and maintain bridges at road crossings, see §

24-1-113

.

As to permitting or allowing waters to be dammed up for irrigation or mining ditches so as to overflow on public roads or highways or undermine, weaken or damage any bridge, etc., see §

24-1-116

.

As to public health and safety relating to water, see title 35.

As to public lands generally, see title 36.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d Irrigation § 1 et seq.

94 C.J.S. Waters §§ 760 to 921.